New York, session 2025-2026, A4882.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 673 of the county law is renum- 2 bered subdivision 3 and a new subdivision 2 is added to read as follows: 3 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 if it appears that death may have resulted from a crime, the coroner or 5 medical examiner in any county with geographic jurisdiction of such 6 crime pursuant to section 20.40 of the criminal procedure law shall have 7 concurrent jurisdiction and authority to investigate the death. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07685-01-5